fr: Matériau du corps: Aluminum; Composite; Graphite; Acier inoxydable; Autre
cs: Materiál těla: Hliník; Kompozitní; Grafit; Nerezová ocel; Jiné
vi: Vật liệu vỏ: Nhôm; Tổng hợp; Than chì; Thép không gỉ; Khác
ja: 本体部分の素材: アルミニウム; 複合; グラファイト; ステンレススチール; その他
sv: Husmaterial: Aluminium; Sammansatt; Grafit; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
zh-CN: 机身材质: 铝; 复合材料; 石墨; 不锈钢; 其他
de: Körpermaterial: Aluminium; Zusammengesetzt; Graphit; Edelstahl; Sonstiges
es: Material del cuerpo: Aluminio; Compuesto; Grafito; Acero inoxidable; Otros
ro-RO: Material corp: Aluminiu; Compozit; Grafit; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
da: Kropsmateriale: Aluminum; Komposit; Grafit; Rustfrit stål; Andet
bg-BG: Материал на основната част: Алуминий; Композит; Графит; Неръждаема стомана; Други
pt-BR: Material do corpo: Alumínio; Composto; Grafite; Aço inoxidável; Outro
el: Υλικό σώματος: Αλουμίνιο; Σύνθετο υλικό; Γραφίτης; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Άλλο
it: Materiale del corpo: Alluminio; Composito; Grafite; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
nl: Kernmateriaal: Aluminium; Composiet; Grafiet; Roestvrij staal; Andere
pl: Materiał korpusu: Aluminium; Kompozyt; Grafit; Stal nierdzewna; Inne
ko: 본체 소재: 알루미늄; 복합물; 흑연; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
hu: Test anyaga: Alumínium; Kompozit; Grafit; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
zh-TW: 機身材料: 鋁; 複合; 石墨; 不銹鋼; 其他
lt-LT: Meškerykočio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Kompozitas; Grafitas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
sl-SI: Material ogrodja: Aluminij; Kompozit; Grafit; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
tr: Gövde malzemesi: Alüminyum; Kompozit; Grafit; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
hr-HR: Materijal glavnog dijela: Aluminij; Kompozit; Grafit; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
fi: Rungon materiaali: Alumiini; Komposiitti; Grafiitti; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
pt-PT: Material do corpo: Alumínio; Composto; Grafite; Aço inoxidável; Outro
ru: Материал корпуса: Алюминий; Композит; Графит; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
nb: Kroppsmateriale: Aluminium; Kompositt; Grafitt; Rustfritt stål; Annet
en: Body material: Aluminum; Composite; Graphite; Stainless steel; Other
th: วัสดุส่วนลำตัว: อะลูมิเนียม; วัสดุคอมโพสิต; แกรไฟท์; เหล็กสเตนเลส; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Materiál hlavnej časti produktu: Hliník; Kompozit; Grafit; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné